Washington statutes.
RCW 40.24.100

Property ownership—Resources.

The secretary of state shall enter into an interagency agreement with the office of civil legal aid to develop and make available information, online self-help resources, and other legal aid services to help participants to own property in the state without public disclosure of such ownership. These resources must also include information to help participants purchase property in the name of a nonprofit organization or corporation, without public disclosure of ownership, in order to establish a safe house for other participants or for sex trafficking victims. The secretary of state and the state and local agencies and nonprofit agencies designated by the secretary of state under RCW 40.24.080 shall publicize the availability of legal resources and assistance under this section to program participants and applicants. The secretary of state may not provide direct legal resources and assistance to participants. No fee may be charged to the participants for legal assistance under this section. This section creates no individual right to legal assistance or representation in litigation at public expense.

[ 2019 c 122 s 2.]